Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 325.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall assume or use the title or designation "certified public accountant," "public accountant," or the
abbreviation "CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to
indicate that the person is a certified public accountant, unless the person holds a license issued under this
chapter or qualifies for a practice privilege under KRS 325.282.
(2) No firm shall assume or use the title or designation "certified public accountants," "public accountants," or the
abbreviation "CPA's" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending
to indicate that the firm is composed of certified public accountants, unless the firm:
(a) Holds a license issued under this chapter which has not been revoked or suspended, and all offices of
the firm in this state are maintained as required under this chapter; or
(b) Is authorized to do so as provided for in KRS 325.301.
(3) No individuals or firm shall assume or use the title or designation "certified accountant," "chartered
accountant," "enrolled accountant," "licensed accountant," "registered accountant," "accredited auditor,"
"accounting practitioner," "accredited accountant," "expert accountant," "expert auditor," "certified auditor," or
any other title or designation likely to be confused with "certified public accountant" and "public accountant"
or any of the abbreviations "CA," "AP," "PA," "RA," "LA," or "AA" or similar abbreviations likely to be
confused with "CPA."
(4) No person or firm shall sign or affix his or her name or a firm name to any document or prepare or issue any
document which indicates that the person or firm performed attest services or that includes any language
which indicates that the person or the firm has expert knowledge in performing attest services, unless the
person or firm holds a license to practice issued under this chapter or is exempt from having to obtain a license
pursuant to KRS 325.301. This prohibition shall be applicable to issuance by any unlicensed person or firm of
a report using any form of language conventionally used by licensees with respect to a compilation of financial
statements or on any attest service. Nonlicensees may use safe harbor language provided in 201 KAR 1:180 in
connection with a compilation of financial information. The provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit any
officer, employee, partner, or principal of any organization from affixing his or her signature to any statement
or report in reference to the financial affairs of the organization with any wording designating the position,
title, or office which he or she holds in the organization, nor shall the provisions of this subsection prohibit
any act of a public official or public employee in the performance of his or her duties.
(5) No person shall assume or use the title or designation "certified public accountant" or "public accountant" in
conjunction with names indicating or implying that there is a firm, or in conjunction with the designation "and
Company" or "and Associates" or a similar designation if there is in fact no bona fide firm licensed under this
chapter or exempted from licensure under KRS 325.301.
(6) No person or firm holding a license under this chapter shall use a professional or firm name or designation
which contains the names of any nonlicensees, is misleading as to the legal form of the firm, or as to the
persons who are partners, officers, shareholders, or any other owners of the firm, or as to any other matters,
provided however, the name of one (1) or more deceased or retired partner, member, manager, or
shareholder, whose name had been included in the firm name may continue to be included in the name of a
firm or its successor.[ If more than one (1) certified public accountant has an ownership interest in the firm,
the names of one (1) or more deceased, retired, or withdrawn partners, shareholders, or other certified public
accountants with an ownership interest may be included in the name of a firm or its successor.
(7) If the death or retirement of a certified public accountant results in a firm having only one (1) certified public
accountant with an ownership interest, the board may permit the firm to continue to use the firm name for no
more than two (2) years from the certified public accountant's respective death or retirement.]
Signed by Governor March 10, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY